West Virginia, session 2025, SB314.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. Authorization for Department of Environmental Protection to promulgate legislative rules. §64-3-1. Department of Environmental Protection. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 23, 2024, authorized under the authority of §22-5-4 of this code, modified by the Department of Environmental Protection to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 18, 2024, relating to the Department of Environmental Protection (control of air pollution from hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities, 45 CSR 25), is authorized.